Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.644

[Art. 81] Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 80.]